lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Saksofonų priedai > Saksofonų priežiūra ir valymas: Saksofonų priežiūros įrenginiai; Saksofonų pagalvėlių apsaugos; Saksofonų šluostės
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件 > 薩克斯風配件 > 薩克斯風清潔保養: 薩克斯風保養組; 薩克斯風清潔棒; 薩克斯風通條布
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Saksafon Aksesuarları > Saksafon Bakımı ve Temizliği: Saksafon Bakım Setleri; Saksafon Güderi Koruyucular; Saksafon Temizleme Harbileri
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych > Akcesoria do saksofonów > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do saksofonów: Zestawy do konserwacji saksofonów; Wyciory do saksofonów; Ściereczki do saksofonów
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství > Saxofony – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění saxofonu: Soupravy pro údržbu saxofonu; Chrániče klapek pro saxofon; Vytěráky pro saxofony
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent > Accessoires pour saxophones > Entretien et nettoyage des saxophones: Kits d’entretien pour saxophones; Sèche tampon pour saxophones; Écouvillons pour saxophones
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument > Saxofontillbehör > Underhåll och rengöring av saxofoner: Rengöringsset för saxofoner; Rengöringsborstar för saxofoner; Torkdukar till saxofoner
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala > Dodatki za saksofon > Nega in čiščenje saksofona: Kompleti za nego saksofona; Blazinice za čiščenje saksofona; Čistilne palčke za saksofon
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품 > 색소폰 부대용품 > 색소폰 관리/청소 용품: 색소폰 관리 키트; 색소폰 패드 세이버; 색소폰 스왑
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet > Saksofonitarvikkeet > Saksofonin huolto ja puhdistus: Saksofonin huoltopakkaukset; Saksofonin suojalaipat; Saksofonin kuivausliinat
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten > Accessoires voor saxofoon > Onderhoud en reiniging van saxofoon: Onderhoudskits voor saxofoon; Wissers voor saxofoonpads; Doeken voor saxofoon
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти > Аксесоари за саксофон > Грижа и почистване на саксофон: Комплекти за поддръжка на саксофон; Почистващи четки за саксофон; Шомполи за саксофон
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat > Accesorii pentru saxofon > Îngrijirea și curățarea saxofonului: Seturi de îngrijire a saxofonului; Protecții pentru pernițe saxofon; Bețișoare pentru curățarea saxofonului
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ σαξοφώνου > Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός σαξοφώνου: Κιτ φροντίδας σαξοφώνου; Προστατευτικά επιθεμάτων σαξοφώνου; Πανιά καθαρισμού σαξοφώνου
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件 > 萨克斯配件 > 萨克斯清洁保养: 萨克斯保养套装; 萨克斯内腔掸子; 萨克斯通管布/擦拭布
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter > Saksofontilbehør > Pleie og rengjøring av saksofon: Pleiesett for saksofon; Piperensere for saksofon; Saksofonfliser
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories > Saxophone Accessories > Saxophone Care & Cleaning: Saxophone Care Kits; Saxophone Pad Savers; Saxophone Swabs
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente > Zubehör für Saxophone > Saxophonpflege &-reinigung: Saxophonpflegesets; Saxophonklappenschutz; Saxophonreinigungstücher
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők > Szaxofonkiegészítők > Szaxofonápolás és -tisztítás: Szaxofonápoló készletek; Szaxofon-párnavédők; Szaxofon-törlőkendők
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品 > サックス用品 > サックスお手入れ用品: サックスお手入れセット; サックス用パッドセイバー; サックス用スワブ
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов > Аксессуары для саксофонов > Чистка саксофонов и уход за ними: Наборы для ухода за саксофонами; Осушающие ершики для саксофонов; Протирки для саксофонов
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras > Acessórios para saxofone > Limpeza e cuidado de saxofone: Kits de cuidado para saxofone; Escovas para saxofone; Toalhetes para saxofone
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Acessórios para saxofone > Manutenção e limpeza de saxofone: Kits de manutenção para saxofone; Protetores de sapatilhas para saxofone; Escovas de limpeza para saxofone
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre saxofón > Starostlivosť a čistenie saxofónu: Súpravy starostlivosti o saxofón; Čistiace kefky na saxofón; Tampóny na saxofón
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า > อุปกรณ์แซกโซโฟน > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดแซกโซโฟน: ชุดการดูแลแซกโซโฟน; Pad Saver ของแซกโซโฟน; ผ้าทำความสะอาดแซกโซโฟน
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør > Saxofon – tilbehør > Saxofon – pleje og rengøring: Saxofon – rengøringssæt; Saxofon – rensere; Saxofon – renseklude
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi > Phụ kiện kèn saxophone > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn saxophone: Bộ sản phẩm chăm sóc kèn saxophone; Cây lau kèn saxophone; Dụng cụ lau ống kèn saxophone
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala > Pribor za saksofon > Održavanje i čišćenje saksofona: Kompleti za održavanje saksofona; Četke za klapne saksofona; Štapići za čišćenje saksofona
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera > Accesorios para saxofón > Limpieza y cuidado del saxofón: Kits de mantenimiento para saxofón; Escobillones para saxofón; Escobillas para saxofón
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni > Accessori per sassofono > Cura e pulitura sassofono: Kit pulizia sassofono; Protezioni cuscinetti sassofono; Scovoli per sassofono